Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 4001.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Articles of organization” means initial, amended, and restated articles of organization and articles of merger. In the case of a foreign limited liability company, the term includes all documents serving a similar function required to be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State, or comparable office, of the company’s jurisdiction of organization.

“Business” includes every trade, occupation, profession, and other lawful purpose, whether or not carried on for profit.

“Debtor in bankruptcy” means a person who is the subject of an order for relief under Title 11 of the U.S. Code or a comparable order under a successor statute of general application or a comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency.

“Delivery” means transmission by surface mail or by a method of electronic transmission the Secretary of State may prescribe.

“Designated office” means the office of a limited liability company designated pursuant to section 4007 of this title or the principal office of a foreign limited liability company.

“Dissolution” means an event under section 4101 of this title which requires a limited liability company to wind up its affairs and to terminate its existence as a legal entity.

“Dissociation” means a complete termination of a member’s continued membership in a limited liability company for any reason.

“Distribution” means a transfer of money or property from a limited liability company to a member in the member’s capacity as a member or to a transferee of the member’s distributional interest.

“Distributional interest” means the right of a member or transferee to receive a distribution from a limited liability company.

“Document” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Entity” means a person other than an individual.

“Foreign limited liability company” means an unincorporated entity organized under laws, other than the laws of this State, which afford limited liability to its owners comparable to the liability under section 4042 of this title.

“Limited liability company” or “company,” except in the phrase “foreign limited liability company,” means an organization formed under this chapter or subject to this chapter following a merger, conversion, or domestication pursuant to subchapter 10 of this chapter.

“L3C” or “low-profit limited liability company” means a limited liability company that elects to be a low-profit limited liability company pursuant to section 4161 of this title and meets the requirements of section 4162 of this title.

“Manager” means a person that under the operating agreement of a manager-managed limited liability company is responsible, alone or in concert with others, for performing the management functions stated in subsection 4054(c) of this title.

“Manager-managed limited liability company” means a limited liability company that qualifies under subsection 4054(a) of this title.

“Meeting” means any structured communication conducted by participants in person or through an electronic or telecommunications medium that permits simultaneous or sequentially structured communications.

“Member” means a person that has become a member of a limited liability company under section 4051 of this title and has not dissociated under section 4081 of this title.

“Member-managed limited liability company” means a limited liability company that is not a manager-managed limited liability company.

“Operating agreement” means any form of description of membership rights and obligations under section 4003 of this title, stored or depicted in any tangible or electronic medium, which is agreed to by the members, including amendments to the agreement.

“Record,” used as a noun, means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Sign” means, with the present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

to attach or to logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Transfer” includes an assignment, a conveyance, a sale, a lease, an encumbrance, including a mortgage or security interest, a gift, and a transfer by operation of law.

“Writing” means a written communication, including a letter, fax, e-mail, or other electronic format that may be prescribed by the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4002.
Knowledge and notice.

A person knows a fact if the person has actual knowledge of it.

A person has notice of a fact if the person:

has received a notification of the fact;

has reason to know of the fact from all of the facts known to the person at the time in question; or

is deemed to have notice of the fact under subsection (d) of this section.

A person notifies or gives a notification of a fact to another by taking steps reasonably required to inform the other person in the ordinary course, whether or not they cause the other person to know the fact.

In the case of a limited liability company’s dissolution, termination, or merger or conversion, a person who is not a member of the company is deemed to have notice as follows:

for a dissolution, 90 days after a statement of dissolution under section 4103 of this title becomes effective;

for a termination, 90 days after the articles of termination under section 4105 of this title become effective; and

for a merger or conversion, upon the effective date of articles of merger or a statement of conversion filed with the Secretary of State.

A person receives a notification when the notification:

comes to the person’s attention; or

is delivered at the person’s place of business or at any other place held out by the person as a place for receiving communications.

A member’s knowledge, notice, or receipt of a notification of a fact in the member’s capacity as a member does not impute knowledge, notice, or receipt of notification of the fact to the limited liability company.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4003.
Effect of operating agreement; nonwaivable provisions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, an operating agreement regulates the affairs of the company and the conduct of its business and governs relations among the members, among the managers, and among the members, managers, and the limited liability company. To the extent the operating agreement does not otherwise provide, this chapter regulates the affairs of the company, the conduct of its business, and governs relations among the members, among the managers, and among members, managers, and the limited liability company.

An operating agreement may not:

vary a limited liability company’s capacity under subsection 4011(e) of this title to sue and be sued in its own name;

except as provided in subchapter 8 of this chapter, vary the law applicable under subsection 4011(g) of this title;

vary the power of the court under section 4030 of this title;

subject to subsections (c) through (f) of this section, eliminate or restrict the duty of loyalty, the duty of care, or any other fiduciary duty;

subject to subsections (c) through (f) of this section, eliminate or restrict the contractual obligation of good faith and fair dealing under subsection 4059(d) of this title;

unreasonably restrict the duties and rights with respect to books, records, and other information stated in section 4058 of this title, but the operating agreement may impose reasonable restrictions on the availability and use of information obtained under that section and may define appropriate remedies, including liquidated damages, for a breach of any reasonable restriction on use;

vary the power of a court to decree dissolution in the circumstances specified in subdivision 4101(a)(4) of this title;

vary the requirement to wind up a limited liability company’s business as specified in section 4101 of this title;

unreasonably restrict the right of a member to maintain an action under subchapter 9 of this chapter;

restrict the right to approve a merger, conversion, or domestication under section 4152 of this title to a member that will have personal liability with respect to a surviving, converted, or domesticated organization; or

restrict the rights under this title of a person other than a member, manager, or transferee of any interest in a limited liability company.

Unless unreasonable, the operating agreement may:

restrict the duty:

as required in subdivision 4059(b)(1) and subsection 4059(h) of this title, to account to the limited liability company and to hold as trustee for it any property, profit, or benefit derived by the member in the conduct or winding up of the company’s business, from a use by the member of the company’s property, or from the appropriation of a limited liability company opportunity;

as required in subdivision 4059(b)(2) and subsection 4059(h) of this title, to refrain from dealing with the company in the conduct or winding up of the company’s business as or on behalf of a party having an interest adverse to the company; and

as required in subdivision 4059(b)(3) and subsection 4059(h) of this title, to refrain from competing with the company in the conduct of the company’s business before the dissolution of the company;

identify the specific types or categories of activities that do not violate the duty of loyalty;

alter the duty of care, except to authorize intentional misconduct or knowing violation of law;

alter any other fiduciary duty, including eliminating particular aspects of that duty; and

prescribe the standards by which to measure the performance of the contractual obligation of good faith and fair dealing under subsection 4059(d) of this title.

The operating agreement may specify the method by which a specific act or transaction that would otherwise violate the duty of loyalty may be authorized or ratified by one or more disinterested and independent persons after full disclosure of all material facts.

To the extent the operating agreement of a member-managed limited liability company expressly relieves a member of a responsibility that the member would otherwise have under this chapter and imposes the responsibility on one or more other members, the operating agreement may, to the benefit of the member that the operating agreement relieves of the responsibility, also eliminate or limit any fiduciary duty that would have pertained to the responsibility.

The operating agreement may alter or eliminate the indemnification for a member or manager provided by section 4060 of this title and may eliminate or limit a member or manager’s liability to the limited liability company and members for money damages, except for:

breach of the duty of loyalty;

a financial benefit received by the member or manager to which the member or manager is not entitled;

a breach of a duty under subsection 4059(d) of this title;

intentional infliction of harm on the company or a member; or

an intentional violation of criminal law.

The court shall decide any claim under subsection (c) of this section that a term of an operating agreement is manifestly unreasonable.
(g) (1) The court shall decide any claim under subsection (c) of this section that a term of an operating agreement is manifestly unreasonable.

The court:

shall make its determination as of the time the challenged term became part of the operating agreement and by considering only circumstances existing at that time; and

may invalidate the term only if, in light of the purposes and activities of the limited liability company, it is readily apparent that:

the objective of the term is unreasonable; or

the term is an unreasonable means to achieve the provision’s objective.

A limited liability company is bound by and may enforce the operating agreement, whether or not the company has itself manifested assent to the operating agreement.

A person that becomes a member of a limited liability company is deemed to assent to the operating agreement.

Two or more persons intending to become the initial members of a limited liability company may make an agreement providing that upon the formation of the company the agreement will become the operating agreement.
(j) (1) Two or more persons intending to become the initial members of a limited liability company may make an agreement providing that upon the formation of the company the agreement will become the operating agreement.

One person intending to become the initial member of a limited liability company may assent to terms providing that upon the formation of the company the terms will become the operating agreement.

An operating agreement may specify that its amendment requires the approval of a person that is not a party to the operating agreement or the satisfaction of a condition.
(k) (1) An operating agreement may specify that its amendment requires the approval of a person that is not a party to the operating agreement or the satisfaction of a condition.

An amendment is ineffective if its adoption does not include the required approval or satisfy the specified condition.

The obligations of a limited liability company and its members to a person in the person’s capacity as a transferee or dissociated member are governed by the operating agreement.
(l) (1) The obligations of a limited liability company and its members to a person in the person’s capacity as a transferee or dissociated member are governed by the operating agreement.

Subject only to any court order issued under subdivision 4074(b)(2) of this title to effectuate a charging order, an amendment to the operating agreement made after a person becomes a transferee or dissociated member is effective with regard to any debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited liability company or its members to the person in the person’s capacity as a transferee or dissociated member.

If a record that has been delivered by a limited liability company to the Secretary of State for filing and has become effective under this chapter contains a provision that would be ineffective under subsection (b) of this section if contained in the operating agreement, the provision is likewise ineffective in the record.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, if a record that has been delivered by a limited liability company to the Secretary of State for filing and has become effective under this title conflicts with a provision of the operating agreement:

the operating agreement prevails as to members, dissociated members, transferees, and managers; and

the record prevails as to other persons to the extent they reasonably rely on the record.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2; amended

2015, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2015, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § E.3.

§ 4004.
Supplemental principles of law.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

If an obligation to pay interest arises under this chapter and the rate is not specified, the rate shall be 12 percent per annum computed by the actuarial method.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4005.
Name.

Except for a low-profit limited liability company, the name of a limited liability company as set forth in its articles of organization shall contain the words “limited liability company” or “limited company” or the abbreviation “L.L.C.,” “LLC,” “L.C.,” or “LC.” The word “limited” may be abbreviated as “Ltd.” and “company” may be abbreviated as “Co.” in a limited liability company name.
(a) (1) Except for a low-profit limited liability company, the name of a limited liability company as set forth in its articles of organization shall contain the words “limited liability company” or “limited company” or the abbreviation “L.L.C.,” “LLC,” “L.C.,” or “LC.” The word “limited” may be abbreviated as “Ltd.” and “company” may be abbreviated as “Co.” in a limited liability company name.

The name of a low-profit limited liability company shall contain the abbreviation L3C.

Unless authorized under subsection (c) of this section, the name of a limited liability company shall be distinguishable in the records of the Secretary of State from:

the name of each person that is not an individual and that is incorporated, organized, or authorized to transact business in this State; and

each name reserved under:

sections 1621a, 4006, and 3403 of this title;

11A V.S.A. § 4.02;

11B V.S.A. § 4.02; and

11C V.S.A. § 112.

A person may apply to the Secretary of State for authorization to use a name that does not comply with subsection (b) of this section. The Secretary of State shall authorize use of the name applied for if, as to each noncomplying name:

the present user, registrant, or owner of the name consents to the applicant’s use of the name in a signed record and submits an undertaking in a form satisfactory to the Secretary of State to change its name to a new name that complies with subsection (b) of this section; or

the applicant delivers to the Secretary of State a certified copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant’s right to use in this State the name applied for.

Subject to section 4116 of this title, this section applies to a foreign limited liability company transacting business in this State that has a certificate of authority to transact business in this State or which has applied for a certificate of authority.

A person intending to operate a postsecondary school, as defined in

16 V.S.A. §§ 176

and 176a, shall apply for a certificate of approval from the State Board of Education prior to registering a name under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4006.
Reserved name.

A person may reserve the exclusive use of the name of a limited liability company, including a fictitious or assumed name for a foreign limited liability company whose name is not available, by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing.
(a) (1) A person may reserve the exclusive use of the name of a limited liability company, including a fictitious or assumed name for a foreign limited liability company whose name is not available, by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing.

The application shall state the name and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved.

If the Secretary of State finds that the name applied for is available, the Secretary shall reserve that name for the applicant’s exclusive use for a 120-day period.

The owner of a reserved limited liability company name may renew the reservation for successive periods of 120 days each by delivering a renewal application to the Secretary of State during the 45-day period preceding the date of expiration of the reservation.

The owner of a name reserved for a limited liability company may assign the reservation to another person by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a signed notice of the assignment that states the name and address of the assignee.

The owner of a reserved limited liability company name may terminate the name reservation by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a signed notice of withdrawal of name reservation.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4007.
Designated office and agent.

A limited liability company and a foreign limited liability company authorized to do business in this State shall designate and continuously maintain:

a designated office for notification purposes, which may but need not be a place of its business, and may but need not be located in this State; and

an agent and street address of the agent for service of process on the limited liability company in this State.

An agent for service of process shall be an individual resident of this State, a domestic corporation, another limited liability company, or a foreign corporation or foreign limited liability company authorized to do business in this State.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4008.
Change of designated office or agent for service of process.

A limited liability company or foreign limited liability company may change its designated office or agent for service of process by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of change that sets forth:

the name of the company;

the street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of its current designated office;

if the current designated office is to be changed, the street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of the new designated office;

the name and address of its current agent for service of process; and

if the current agent for service of process is to be changed, the name of the new agent for service of process and the new agent’s written consent, either on the statement or attached to it, to the appointment.

If an agent for service of process changes the street address of the agent’s business office, the agent may change the street address of the designated office of any limited liability company or foreign limited liability company for which the agent is the agent for service of process by notifying the company in writing of the change and signing, either manually or in facsimile, and filing with the Secretary of State a statement that complies with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section and recites that the company has been notified of the change.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4009.
Resignation of agent for service of process.

To resign as an agent for service of process of a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company, the agent shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of resignation containing the company name and stating that the agent is resigning.

The Secretary of State shall file a statement of resignation delivered under subsection (a) of this section and mail or otherwise deliver a copy to the designated office of the limited liability company.

An agency for service of process terminates on the earlier of:

the 41st day after the Secretary of State files the statement of resignation; or

when a record designating a new agent for service of process is delivered to the Secretary of State for filing on behalf of the limited liability company and becomes effective.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4010.
Service of process.

An agent for service of process appointed by a limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company is an agent of the company for service of any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the company.

If a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company fails to appoint or maintain an agent for service of process in this State or the agent for service of process cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the agent’s address, the Secretary of State is an agent of the company upon whom process, notice, or demand may be served.

Service of any process, notice, or demand on the Secretary of State may be made by delivering to and leaving with the Secretary of State duplicate copies of the process, notice, or demand. If the process, notice, or demand is served on the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State shall forward one of the copies by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the company at its registered office. Service on the Secretary of State shall be returnable in not less than 30 days.

The Secretary of State shall keep a record of all processes, notices, and demands served pursuant to this section and record the time of and the action taken regarding the service.

This section shall not affect the right to serve process, notice, or demand upon a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company in any manner otherwise provided by law.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4011.
Nature of business and powers; governing law.

A limited liability company is an entity distinct from its members.

A limited liability company may have any lawful purpose, regardless of whether for profit.

A limited liability company has perpetual duration.

A limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company engaging in a business subject to any other provisions of law of this State governing or regulating business may be formed or authorized to transact business under this chapter only if permitted by, and subject to all limitations of, the other statute.
(d) (1) A limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company engaging in a business subject to any other provisions of law of this State governing or regulating business may be formed or authorized to transact business under this chapter only if permitted by, and subject to all limitations of, the other statute.

The following shall not be formed or authorized to transact business under this chapter:

a credit union regulated under Title 8;

an insurance company regulated under Title 8, except that a captive insurance company regulated under 8 V.S.A. chapter 141 may be formed as a limited liability company;

a railroad company regulated under Title 19.

A limited liability company shall possess and may exercise all the powers and privileges granted by this chapter, any other law, its articles of organization, or its operating agreement, together with any powers incidental thereto, so far as the powers and privileges are necessary or convenient to the conduct, promotion, or attainment of the business purposes or activities of the limited liability company, including power to sue and to be sued, complain and defend in its company name, and the power to do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities.

The law of this State governs:

the internal affairs of a limited liability company; and

the liability of a member as member and a manager as manager for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited liability company.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company shall engage in rendering professional services only to the extent that, and subject to the conditions and limitations under which, a professional corporation may engage in rendering professional services under chapter 4 of this title.
(g) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company shall engage in rendering professional services only to the extent that, and subject to the conditions and limitations under which, a professional corporation may engage in rendering professional services under chapter 4 of this title.

For purposes of applying the provisions, conditions, and limitations of chapter 4 of this title, unless the licensing laws of this State expressly prohibit the provision of professional services by domestic and foreign limited liability companies:

unless the context clearly requires otherwise, references to 11A V.S.A. chapters 1-20, relating to business corporations shall be treated as references to this chapter, and references to a “corporation” shall be treated as references to a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company;

the members shall be treated in the same manner as shareholders of a professional corporation;

managers shall be treated in the same manner as directors of a professional corporation;

the persons signing the articles of organization of the company shall be treated in the same manner as the incorporators of a professional corporation; and

the name shall comply with sections 4005 and 4116 of this title and, in addition, shall contain the word “Professional” or the abbreviation “P.L.C.,” “PLC,” “P.L.L.C.,” or “PLLC.”

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4012.
Fees.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees when a document described in this section is delivered to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing:

Articles of organization $125.00 (2) Application for certificate of authority $125.00 (3) Amendment of articles or certificate of authority $25.00 (4) Cancellation of certificate of authority $20.00 (5) Application for reserved name $20.00 (6) Notice of transfer of reserved name No fee (7) Application for registered name $25.00 (8) Application for renewal of registered name $25.00 (9) Statement of change of designated agent or designated office, or both $25.00 and not to exceed $1,000.00 per filer per calen- dar year (10) Agent’s statement of resignation no fee (11) Restatement of articles of organization $25.00 (12) Articles of correction $25.00 (13) Application for certificate of existence or authorization $25.00 (14) Articles of merger $50.00 (15) Annual report of a domestic limited liability company $35.00 (16) Annual report of a foreign limited liability company $140.00 (17) Reinstatement $25.00 (18) Any other document required or permitted to be filed by this chapter $20.00

Click to view

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees:

$25.00 each time process is served on the Secretary under this chapter. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if he or she prevails in the proceeding.

$25.00 for the certificate certifying the copy of any filed document relating to a limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.